Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 10. Initiative and Referendum

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 311.

§ 22-23-1001.
Ordinance by initiative petition; content.

An incorporated city or town having a commission form of government may propose a municipal ordinance by an initiative petition signed by ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors registered in the city or town and filed with the municipal clerk. The petition shall contain the proposed ordinance, the signatures and residence addresses of electors signing the petition, and the date of signing the petition. A petition proposing an ordinance must be submitted to the municipal clerk within ten (10) months of the date of the first signature supporting the petition.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-359; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-23-1002.
Determining validity of petition; certification.

As soon as an initiative petition is filed, the municipal clerk shall determine whether it contains sufficient legal signatures. If the petition is legally sufficient, the clerk shall immediately certify it to the governing body of the municipality.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-360; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-23-1003.
Adoption by governing body or submission to electors.

An ordinance proposed by a valid initiative petition shall either be adopted within twenty (20) days by the governing body or submitted to a vote of the municipal electors at a special election to be held not more than sixty (60) nor less than twenty (20) days thereafter. The ordinance proposed may also be submitted to a vote of the municipal electors at a primary or general election only if a valid initiative petition is received not less than one hundred ten (110) days before the election if for a primary and not less than seventy (70) days before the election if for a general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-361; 2011, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “unless the primary or general municipal election occurs within ninety (90) days, in which case the measure shall be submitted at the primary or general election” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

§ 22-23-1004.
Adoption by electors; repealing or amending.

If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question vote in favor of a proposed initiative ordinance, it is adopted and may not be repealed or amended except by a majority vote of the qualified electors of the municipality.

The municipal governing body may submit to a vote of the people at a special election or a regular municipal, primary or general election, the question of repealing or amending an ordinance adopted by initiative petition.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-362.

§ 22-23-1005.
Ordinance adopted by governing body subject to referendum vote.

An ordinance adopted by a municipal governing body shall be subject to a referendum vote if a petition signed by ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors registered in the city or town is filed with the municipal clerk not later than twenty (20) days after the ordinance is first published after adoption as provided by law. To be counted the electors shall be registered voters when the completed petition is submitted for verification. The referendum petition shall set forth the ordinance in full and shall contain the signatures and residence addresses of persons signing the petition.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-363; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2010, ch. 44, § 1; 2011, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “twenty (20) days” for “ten (10) days.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted the present second sentence.

Erroneous rejection of signatures. —

It was error for a city clerk to reject signatures on a municipal referendum petition of voters who moved within the city without notifying the county clerk because this did not automatically disqualify the voters, as (1) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 22-3-115(a) stated the criteria for cancelling a voter's registration, and, (2) under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-3-116

, a registration could not be cancelled automatically. City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

§ 22-23-1006.
Legal sufficiency of referendum petition.

The municipal clerk shall determine if the referendum petition meets the requirements of W.S.

22-23-1005

, and if he finds a petition legally sufficient, he shall certify it to the governing body who shall suspend the ordinance.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-364; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Erroneous rejection of signatures. —

It was error for a city clerk to reject signatures on a municipal referendum petition of voters who moved within the city without notifying the county clerk because this did not automatically disqualify the voters, as (1) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 22-3-115(a) stated the criteria for cancelling a voter's registration, and, (2) under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-3-116

, a registration could not be cancelled automatically. City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

§ 22-23-1007.
Partial repeal of ordinance subject to referendum; acceptance or rejection by electors.

If the governing body does not entirely repeal an ordinance subject to referendum, it shall submit the question to the electors of the municipality in the same manner as an ordinance proposed by initiative petition. If a majority of the electors voting on the question favor rejection, the ordinance shall not become effective. If a majority of the electors voting on the question do not favor rejection, the ordinance shall become effective after the vote is canvassed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-365.

Cross references. —

As to manner of submitting ordinance proposed by initiative petition, see §

22-23-1003

.